it: Formato del grafico del pattern per ricamo a tela: Schema a fili contati; Guida su tela dipinta a mano; Tela disegnata a tratto; Guida su tela stampata; Solo guida dei punti; Altro
pt-PT: Formato do gráfico do padrão de bordado: Gráfico de ponto contado; Guia de tela pintada à mão; Tela desenhada a linha; Guia de tela impressa; Apenas guia de pontos; Outro
vi: Định dạng sơ đồ mẫu thêu len: Biểu đồ thêu đếm mũi; Mẫu vẽ tay trên canvas; Mẫu vẽ nét trên canvas; Mẫu in trên canvas; Chỉ kèm hướng dẫn mũi thêu; Khác
de: Format des Nadelspitzenmusterdiagramms: Zählmuster; Handbemalte Leinwandanleitung; Leinwand mit Linienzeichnung; Gedruckte Leinwandanleitung; Nur Stichanleitung; Sonstiges
nb: Diagramformat for broderimønster: Tellekart; Håndmalt lerret-guide; Linjetegnet lerret; Trykt lerret-guide; Kun stingguide; Annet
tr: Kanaviçe desen şeması formatı: Sayılı şema; El boyaması kanvas rehberi; Çizgili kanvas; Baskılı kanvas rehberi; Yalnızca dikiş rehberi; Diğer
da: Format til nålemønsterdiagram: Tællemønster; Håndmalet lærredsguide; Linjetegnet lærred; Trykt lærredsguide; Kun stingguide; Andet
es: Formato de diagrama de patrones de bordado: Gráfico contado; Guía de lienzo pintado a mano; Lienzo con líneas dibujadas; Guía de lienzo impreso; Solo guía de puntadas; Otro
fi: Pistokirjonnan kuviokaavion muoto: Laskettava kaavio; Käsinmaalattu ohje kankaalla; Viivoitettu kanavakangas; Painettu ohje kankaalla; Vain pisto-ohje; Muu
sv: Needlepoint – format för mönsterdiagram: Räknat mönster; Handmålad canvas-guide; Linjeritad canvas; Tryckt canvas-guide; Endast stynguide; Övrigt
zh-TW: 刺繡圖案表格式: 計數圖表; 手繪畫布指南; 線稿畫布; 印刷畫布指南; 僅針法指南; 其他
nl: Type borduurpatroon: Telpatroon; Handbeschilderde canvasgids; Lijngeschetst canvas; Bedrukte canvasgids; Alleen stikgids; Anders
bg-BG: Формат на схемата за иглени точки: Схема за броене; Ръчно рисувана схема на канава; Канава с разчертани линии; Отпечатана схема на канава; Само ръководство за бодове; Друго
ro-RO: Format al diagramei de model pentru goblen: Schemă cu fire numărate; Ghid pe canava pictată manual; Canava cu linii desenate; Ghid pe canava imprimată; Doar ghid de cusături; Altele
lt-LT: Siuvinėjimo schemos formatas: Skaičiuojama schema; Ranka tapytos drobės gidas; Drobė su linijiniu piešiniu; Atspausdintas drobės gidas; Tik siūlių gidas; Kita
ru: Формат схемы для вышивки: Схема для счетного креста; Канва с ручной росписью; Канва с контурным рисунком; Канва с печатным рисунком; Только руководство по стежкам; Другое
hr-HR: Format uzorka za goblen: Shema za brojeni vez; Ručno oslikani vodič na platnu; Platno s iscrtanim linijama; Vodič tiskan na platnu; Samo vodič za bodove; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบตารางลายปัก: ผังลายแบบนับ; ลายไกด์บนแคนวาสระบายสีด้วยมือ; แคนวาสวาดเส้น; ลายไกด์บนแคนวาสพิมพ์ลาย; ลายไกด์ปักเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Formato do gráfico do padrão de tapeçaria: Gráfico contado; Guia em tela pintada à mão; Tela desenhada com linhas; Guia em tela impressa; Apenas guia de pontos; Outro
en: Needlepoint pattern chart format: Counted chart; Hand-painted canvas guide; Line-drawn canvas; Printed canvas guide; Stitch guide only; Other
cs: Formát schématu pro vyšívání: Počítaný vzor; Ručně malovaný vzor na plátno; Plátno s předkreslenými čarami; Potištěný vzor na plátno; Pouze průvodce stehy; Ostatní
ja: 針ポイントパターンチャートフォーマット: カウントチャート; 手描きキャンバスガイド; 線画キャンバス; プリントキャンバスガイド; ステッチガイドのみ; その他
pl: Format wzorów haftu gobelinowego: Wzór liczony; Ręcznie malowana kanwa; Kanwa z nadrukowanym konturem; Kanwa z nadrukowanym wzorem; Tylko przewodnik po ściegach; Inne
ko: 니들포인트 패턴 차트 형식: 카운티드 차트; 핸드페인팅 캔버스 가이드; 라인 드로잉 캔버스; 프린트 캔버스 가이드; 스티치 가이드 전용; 기타
sk-SK: Formát schémy vzoru na vyšívanie: Počítaná schéma; Ručne maľovaná predloha na plátne; Plátno s nakreslenými čiarami; Tlačená predloha na plátne; Len sprievodca stehmi; Iné
sl-SI: Format sheme/grafikona vzorca za vezenje: Grafikon za štetje; Ročno poslikano vodilo za platno; [Platno z narisanimi črtami, Platni z narisanimi črtami, Platna z narisanimi črtami, Platen z narisanimi črtami]; Natisnjeno vodilo za platno; Samo vodilo za šive; Drugo
fr: Format de diagramme pour la broderie: Grille pour point compté; Guide sur toile peinte à la main; Toile avec lignes tracées; Guide sur toile imprimée; Guide de points uniquement; Autre
el: Μορφή διαγράμματος μοτίβου βελόνας: Διάγραμμα με μέτρημα; Οδηγός σε καμβά ζωγραφισμένο στο χέρι; Καμβάς με σχεδιασμένες γραμμές; Εκτυπωμένος οδηγός σε καμβά; Μόνο οδηγός βελονιών; Άλλο
hu: Gobelin mintatáblázat formátuma: Számolásos minta; Kézzel festett vászonútmutató; Vonalrajzos vászon; Nyomtatott vászonútmutató; Csak öltésútmutató; Egyéb
zh-CN: 针绣图案图纸格式: 数格图纸; 手绘帆布指南; 线条绘制帆布; 印刷帆布指南; 仅缝合指南; 其他